it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Parti per bicicletta > Manubri per bicicletta: Manubri per BMX; Manubri flat e riser per bicicletta; Manubri bullhorn e aero; Manubri da corsa
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Piezas para bicicletas > Manillares para bicicletas: Manubrios para BMX; Manubrios planos y de doble altura para bicicleta; Manubrios aerodinámicos y tipo cuerno; Manubrios de caída
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Części rowerowe > Kierownice rowerowe: Kierownice do rowerów BMX; Kierownice rowerowe proste i gięte; Kierownice rowerowe typu bycze rogi i czasowe; Kierownice rowerowe typu baranek
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių dalys > Dviračių vairai: BMX vairai; Dviračių tiesūs ir pakelti vairai; „Bullhorn“ ir aerodinaminiai vairai; „Drop“ tipo vairai
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsonderdelen > Fietssturen: BMX-sturen; Flatbars en riserbars voor fietsen; Bullhorn- en aerosturen; Dropsturen
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부품 > 자전거 핸들: BMX 핸들바; 자전거 플랫 및 라이저 핸들바; 불혼 및 에어로 핸들바; 드롭 핸들바
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อะไหล่จักรยาน > แฮนด์จักรยาน: แฮนด์จักรยานBMX; แฮนด์ตรงและแฮนด์ยกสำหรับจักรยาน; แฮนด์จักรยานแบบบลูฮอร์นและแอโร; แฮนด์หมอบ
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Piese pentru biciclete > Ghidoane pentru biciclete: Ghidoane pentru BMX; Ghidoane plate și riser pentru bicicletă; Ghidoane bullhorn și aero; Ghidoane căzute
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeldelar > Cykelstyren: BMX-styren; Raka styren och riserstyren för cyklar; Bullhorn- och aerostyren; Bockstyren
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Parçaları > Bisiklet Gidonları: BMX gidonları; Düz ve yükseltilmiş bisiklet gidonları; Boynuz ve aero gidonlar; Drop gidonlar
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Части за велосипеди > Кормила за велосипед: Кормила за BMX; Плоски и повдигнати кормила за велосипед; Кормила „булхорн“ и аеродинамични кормила; Шосейни кормила
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Ανταλλακτικά ποδηλάτου > Τιμόνια ποδηλάτου: Τιμόνια BMX; Τιμόνια ποδηλάτου Flat & Riser; Τιμόνια Bullhorn & Aero; Τιμόνια Drop (κουρσάδικα)
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Parts > Bicycle Handlebars: BMX Handlebars; Bicycle Flat & Riser Handlebars; Bullhorn & Aero Handlebars; Drop Handlebars
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Peças para bicicleta > Guiadores para bicicleta: Guiadores de BMX; Guiadores planos e elevados para bicicleta; Guiadores bullhorn e aerodinâmicos; Guiadores de estrada
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpáralkatrészek > Kerékpárkormányok: BMX kormányok; Egyenes és emelt kerékpárkormányok; Bullhorn és aero kormányok; Országúti koskormányok
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradbauteile > Fahrradlenkstangen: BMX-Lenker; Flat- & Riser-Fahrradlenker; Bullhorn- & Aero-Lenker; Rennradlenker
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車零件 > 自行車手把: BMX 把手; 自行車平把與燕把; 牛角把與空力把手; 下彎把手
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeldele > Cykelstyr: BMX-styr; Flade styr og riser-styr til cykler; Bullhorn- og aerostyr; Racerstyr
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Детали для велосипедов > Рули для велосипедов: Рули для BMX; Прямые рули и рули с подъемом; Рули типа «булхорн» и аэрорули; Рули-«бараны»
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Phụ tùng xe đạp > Ghi đông xe đạp: Ghi đông xe đạp BMX; Ghi đông thẳng & vểnh xe đạp; Ghi đông sừng bò & ghi đông khí động học; Ghi đông cong
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Kolesarski deli > Kolesarska krmila: Krmila za kolesa BMX; Ravna in dvignjena krmila za kolesa; Bullhorn in aero krmila; Spuščena krmila
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Pièces détachées vélo > Guidons de vélo: Guidons de BMX; Guidons droits et relevés pour vélo; Guidons corne de vache et aéro; Guidons de course
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Peças de bicicleta > Guidões para bicicleta: Guidões BMX; Guidões retos e riser para bicicleta; Guidões bullhorn e aero; Guidões drop
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车零配件 > 自行车把: BMX 车把; 自行车直把和燕把; 飞机把和休息把; 弯把
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Dijelovi za bicikle > Upravljač bicikla: BMX upravljači; Ravni i povišeni upravljač za bicikle; Bullhorn i aero upravljač za bicikl; Drop upravljač za bicikl
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Díly jízdních kol > Řídítka ke kolům: Řídítka na BMX; Rovná a lomená řídítka; Bullhorn a časovkářská řídítka; Silniční řídítka
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Polkupyörän osat > Polkupyörän ohjaustangot: BMX-ohjaustangot; Polkupyörän suorat ja riser-ohjaustangot; Bullhorn- ja aika-ajo-ohjaustangot; Käyrät ohjaustangot
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車パーツ > 自転車用ハンドル: BMXハンドルバー; 自転車用フラット・ライザーハンドルバー; ブルホーン・エアロハンドルバー; ドロップハンドルバー
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Diely pre bicykle > Riadidlá bicykla: Riadidlá na BMX; Rovné a zdvihnuté riadidlá na bicykle; Riadidlá Bullhorn a Aero; Drop riadidlá
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeldeler > Sykkelbøyler: BMX-styrer; Flate styrer og riser-styrer; Bullhorn- og aerostyrer; Bukkestyrer